Montana, session 2025, HB504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 2-15-3112, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-15-3112. Livestock loss mitigation program -- definitions. The livestock loss board shall
establish and administer a program to reimburse livestock producers for livestock losses caused by wolves,
mountain lions, and grizzly bears, subject to the following provisions:
(1) The board shall establish eligibility requirements for reimbursement, which must provide that all
Montana livestock producers are eligible for coverage for losses by wolves, mountain lions, and grizzly bears to
cattle, domestic bison, swine, horses, mules, sheep, goats, llamas, and livestock guard dogs on state, federal,
tribal, and private land.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), the board may reimburse confirmed and probable
livestock losses at an amount not to exceed the fair market value of the livestock.
(b) The board may reimburse confirmed and probable livestock losses by paying a multiplier of the
fair market value of the livestock based on a board-determined region.
(c) Before the board may issue a reimbursement for losses to a livestock producer eligible for
coverage for losses, the department of revenue shall certify that the livestock producer has paid per capita fees
as required by 15-24-921. Except for a tribal member or tribal entity participating in an authorized agreement
pursuant to 2-15-3113, a livestock producer may not receive a reimbursement for losses until the producer has
paid any delinquent per capita fees.
(3) Other losses may be reimbursed at rates determined by the board.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 504
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 504
(4) A claim process must be established to be used when a livestock producer suffers a livestock
loss for which wolves, mountain lions, or grizzly bears may be responsible. The claim process must set out a
clear and concise method for documenting and processing claims for reimbursement for livestock losses.
(5) Names, addresses, and other personally identifiable information of claimants must remain
confidential and may not be released.
(6) (a) A process must be established to allow livestock producers to appeal reimbursement
decisions. A producer may appeal a staff adjuster's decision by notifying the staff adjuster and the board in
writing, stating the reasons for the appeal and providing documentation supporting the appeal. If the
documentation is incomplete, the board or a producer may consult with the U.S. department of agriculture
wildlife services to complete the documentation.
(b) The board may not accept any appeal on the question of whether the loss was or was not a
confirmed or probable loss because that final determination lies solely with the U.S. department of agriculture
wildlife services and may not be changed by the board.
(c) The board shall hold a hearing on an appeal within 90 days of receipt of the written appeal,
allowing the staff adjuster and the producer to present their positions. A decision must be rendered by the
board within 30 days after the hearing. The producer must be notified in writing of the board's decision.
(7) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Confirmed" means reasonable physical evidence that livestock was actually attacked or killed
by a wolf, mountain lion, or grizzly bear, including but not limited to the presence of bite marks indicative of the
spacing of tooth punctures of wolves, mountain lions, or grizzly bears and associated subcutaneous
hemorrhaging and tissue damage indicating that the attack occurred while the animal was alive, feeding
patterns on the carcass, fresh tracks, scat, hair rubbed off on fences or brush, eyewitness accounts, or other
physical evidence that allows a reasonable inference of wolf, mountain lion, or grizzly bear predation on an
animal that has been largely consumed.
(b) "Fair market value" means:
(i) for commercial sheep more than 1 year old, the average price of sheep of similar age and sex
paid at the most recent Billings livestock sale ring or other ring as determined by the board;
(ii) for commercial lambs, the average market weaning value;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 504
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 504
(iii) for registered sheep, twice the average value of commercial sheep of the same age and sex;
(iv) for commercial cattle more than 1 year old, the average price of cattle of similar age and sex
paid at the most recent Billings livestock sale ring or other ring as determined by the board;
(v) for commercial calves, the average market weaning value;
(vi) for registered cattle, twice the average value of commercial cattle of the same age and sex;
(vii)(vii) for other registered livestock, twice the average value of commercial-grade animals of the
same breed, age, and sex; or
(viii)(viii) for domestic bison and other livestock, the average price paid at the most recent public
auction for the type of animal lost or the replacement price as determined by the board.
(c) "Probable" means the presence of some evidence to suggest possible predation but a lack of
sufficient evidence to clearly confirm predation by a particular species. A kill may be classified as probable
depending on factors including but not limited to recent confirmed predation by the suspected depredating
species in the same or a nearby area, recent observation of the livestock by the owner or the owner's
employees, and telemetry monitoring data, sightings, howling, or fresh tracks suggesting that the suspected
depredating species may have been in the area when the depredation occurred."
Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this act]
to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 504
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 504, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 504
INTRODUCED BY E. TILLEMAN
AN ACT EXPANDING LIVESTOCK ELIGIBILITY UNDER THE LIVESTOCK LOSS MITIGATION PROGRAM TO
INCLUDE DOMESTIC BISON; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AMENDING SECTION 2-15-3112,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”